age
Available on the App Store
100
1K
25
5
50
500
SALE
dropdown
Svg Vector Icons : http://www.onlinewebfonts.com/icon
Furniture Edit Offset
Furniture Edit Remove
Furniture Edit Rotate
3D
Y
Get it on Google Play
IMVU logo
MOD.
profile_location
About Your Privacy
We process your data to deliver content or advertisements and measure the delivery of such content or advertisements to extract insights about our website. We share this information with our partners on the basis of consent. You may exercise your right to consent, based on a specific purpose below or at a partner level in the link under each purpose. Some vendors may process your data based on their legitimate interests, which does not require your consent. You cannot object to tracking technologies placed to ensure security, prevent fraud, fix errors, or deliver and present advertising and content, and precise geolocation data and active scanning of device characteristics for identification may be used to support this purpose. This exception does not apply to targeted advertising. These choices will be signaled to our vendors participating in the Transparency and Consent Framework.
More information
Allow All
Manage Consent Preferences
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site. All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages. If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites. They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Store and/or access information on a device
Cookies, device or similar online identifiers (e.g. login-based identifiers, randomly assigned identifiers, network based identifiers) together with other information (e.g. browser type and information, language, screen size, supported technologies etc.) can be stored or read on your device to recognise it each time it connects to an app or to a website, for one or several of the purposes presented here.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Personalised advertising and content, advertising and content measurement, audience research and services development
Use limited data to select advertising
114 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times an ad is presented to you).
View Illustrations
Create profiles for personalised advertising
86 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (such as forms you submit, content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (for example, information from your previous activity on this service and other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (that might include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present advertising that appears more relevant based on your possible interests by this and other entities.
View Illustrations
Use profiles to select personalised advertising
85 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Advertising presented to you on this service can be based on your advertising profiles, which can reflect your activity on this service or other websites or apps (like the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects.
View Illustrations
Create profiles to personalise content
41 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service (for instance, forms you submit, non-advertising content you look at) can be stored and combined with other information about you (such as your previous activity on this service or other websites or apps) or similar users. This is then used to build or improve a profile about you (which might for example include possible interests and personal aspects). Your profile can be used (also later) to present content that appears more relevant based on your possible interests, such as by adapting the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find content that matches your interests.
View Illustrations
Use profiles to select personalised content
37 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on your content personalisation profiles, which can reflect your activity on this or other services (for instance, the forms you submit, content you look at), possible interests and personal aspects. This can for example be used to adapt the order in which content is shown to you, so that it is even easier for you to find (non-advertising) content that matches your interests.
View Illustrations
Measure advertising performance
138 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which advertising is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine how well an advert has worked for you or other users and whether the goals of the advertising were reached. For instance, whether you saw an ad, whether you clicked on it, whether it led you to buy a product or visit a website, etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of advertising campaigns.
View Illustrations
Measure content performance
69 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information regarding which content is presented to you and how you interact with it can be used to determine whether the (non-advertising) content e.g. reached its intended audience and matched your interests. For instance, whether you read an article, watch a video, listen to a podcast or look at a product description, how long you spent on this service and the web pages you visit etc. This is very helpful to understand the relevance of (non-advertising) content that is shown to you.
View Illustrations
Understand audiences through statistics or combinations of data from different sources
87 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Reports can be generated based on the combination of data sets (like user profiles, statistics, market research, analytics data) regarding your interactions and those of other users with advertising or (non-advertising) content to identify common characteristics (for instance, to determine which target audiences are more receptive to an ad campaign or to certain contents).
View Illustrations
Develop and improve services
94 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Information about your activity on this service, such as your interaction with ads or content, can be very helpful to improve products and services and to build new products and services based on user interactions, the type of audience, etc. This specific purpose does not include the development or improvement of user profiles and identifiers.
View Illustrations
Use limited data to select content
42 partners can use this purpose
Switch Label
Content presented to you on this service can be based on limited data, such as the website or app you are using, your non-precise location, your device type, or which content you are (or have been) interacting with (for example, to limit the number of times a video or an article is presented to you).
View Illustrations
List of IAB Vendors‎
Use precise geolocation data
With your acceptance, your precise location (within a radius of less than 500 metres) may be used in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Actively scan device characteristics for identification
With your acceptance, certain characteristics specific to your device might be requested and used to distinguish it from other devices (such as the installed fonts or plugins, the resolution of your screen) in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your data can be used to monitor for and prevent unusual and possibly fraudulent activity (for example, regarding advertising, ad clicks by bots), and ensure systems and processes work properly and securely. It can also be used to correct any problems you, the publisher or the advertiser may encounter in the delivery of content and ads and in your interaction with them.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Always Active
Certain information (like an IP address or device capabilities) is used to ensure the technical compatibility of the content or advertising, and to facilitate the transmission of the content or ad to your device.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Always Active
Information about your activity on this service may be matched and combined with other information relating to you and originating from various sources (for instance your activity on a separate online service, your use of a loyalty card in-store, or your answers to a survey), in support of the purposes explained in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
In support of the purposes explained in this notice, your device might be considered as likely linked to other devices that belong to you or your household (for instance because you are logged in to the same service on both your phone and your computer, or because you may use the same Internet connection on both devices).
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
Your device might be distinguished from other devices based on information it automatically sends when accessing the Internet (for instance, the IP address of your Internet connection or the type of browser you are using) in support of the purposes exposed in this notice.
List of IAB Vendors‎
Always Active
The choices you make regarding the purposes and entities listed in this notice are saved and made available to those entities in the form of digital signals (such as a string of characters). This is necessary in order to enable both this service and those entities to respect such choices.
List of IAB Vendors‎
| View Illustrations
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
IMVU logo
Log In
Terms of Service
VIP Terms and Conditions
Community Guidelines
Privacy Policy
Creator Agreement and Policy
NFT Terms
Virtual Goods Rating Policy
Digital Millennium Copyright Act (DMCA)
VCORE Terms
VCORE Rewards 1
VCORE Rewards 2
back
IMVU Privacy Notice
Last updated as of: June 22, 2022
Thank you for visiting IMVU’s (“IMVU”, “we”, “us”, “our”) website located at
www.imvu.com
(“Site”) and/or mobile applications, including both IMVU and IMVU Worlds (“Apps”). Collectively, the Site and the Apps are referred to as the “Services” throughout this Privacy Notice.
        This Privacy Notice and our Cookie Notice cover our Site, our Apps, and any other websites, products, software, applications, data feeds, content or services on which an authorized link to this Privacy Notice and Cookie Notice are posted.
Read More
Read Less
>
<
In order to provide the Services, we collect and process personal information. This Privacy Notice and our
Cookie Notice
govern how IMVU may collect, use, store and disclose personal information that we obtain through or in connection with the use of our Services.
We recommend that you read this Privacy Notice carefully as it provides important information about how we handle your personal information. It also tells you about your rights under the law.
You may print a copy of this Privacy Notice by clicking
here
. If you have a disability, you may access this Privacy Notice in an alternative format by contacting us at
privacy@imvu.com
.
IF YOU ARE CALIFORNIA RESIDENT:
If you are a resident of California, this entire Privacy Notice applies to you. However, please see the section titled
“Additional Information for California Residents”
below, which will inform you in detail about our information collection practices and your specific rights.
IF YOU ARE AN INDIVIDUAL LOCATED IN THE EEA OR THE U.K.:
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or the United Kingdom (“U.K.”), this entire Privacy Notice applies to you. However, please see the Section titled
“Additional Information for Individuals in the European Economic Area and the U.K.”
below, which will inform you in detail about our legal bases for processing and which rights you have in connection with our processing of your personal data.
IF YOU ARE A RESIDENT OF NEVADA:
If you are a resident of Nevada, this entire Privacy Notice applies to you. However, please see the Section titled
“Notice for Nevada Consumers”
below, which will also apply to you.
If you have any questions or concerns regarding this Privacy Notice and/or our data practices, or if you would like to exercise your rights, do not hesitate to contact us at
privacy@imvu.com
.
Who We Are/Data Controller
If you use our Services, except as may be stated in this Privacy Notice, the data controller of your information is IMVU, LLC, a Delaware limited liability company with the following contact information:
IMVU, LLC
P.O. Box 2772
Redwood City, CA  94063-2052
United States
Changes to this Privacy Notice
IMVU may update this Privacy Notice from time to time, at our sole discretion. If we do so, we will post an updated Privacy Notice within the Services along with a change notice. Changes, modifications, additions, or deletions will be effective immediately upon their posting to the Services unless otherwise stated in the change notice. If we make material or significant changes, we may also send registered users a notice that this Privacy Notice has been changed. We encourage you to review this Privacy Notice regularly for any changes. Your continued use of the Services and/or your continued provision of personal information to us after the posting of such notice will be deemed an acceptance of any changes and subject to the terms of the then-current Privacy Notice.
Children’s Privacy
Our Services are not intended for children under the age of 13.  IMVU does not target the Services to children under 13 and does not knowingly collect personal information from children under the age of 13.
If you are under the age of 13, please do not register to use the Services and do not give us any information about yourself.
If you are between the ages of 13 and 16 and reside in the EEA, we will obtain your or your parent’s or guardian’s verifiable consent to collect personal information, to the extent and as required by applicable law.
anchor
What Personal Information Do We Collect and How Is It Collected?
Depending on who you are and why you are using our Services, we collect different types of information.
“Personal information” – or “personal data” as also used interchangeably throughout this Privacy Notice – means any information about an individual from which that person may be identified. For example, it may include your name, telephone number, email address, payment information, and your IP address, device ID, and location information. It does not include data from which the identity of an individual has been definitively removed, along with any identifiers connected to an individual.
When you visit or use our Services, we collect personal information
directly
from you when you provide it to us, as well as
indirectly
through automated technologies such as cookies.
Information Collected Directly
Account Registration Information
To use the Services, we request that you provide your:
Name
Avatar or username
Password
Email address
Age
In addition, we may collect any personal information that you elect to voluntarily include in your profile or when you use a certain feature such as the “Friend Matcher” feature, such as your gender, your relationship status, your sexual orientation, your self-selected country and why you are using the Services or the feature.
Note that, unless you have set your preferences to hide certain profile information, other users on our Services will be able to view your profile information and/or information you submit as part of your use of the “Friend Matcher” feature, as applicable.  By voluntarily providing it to us, you expressly consent to our collection and processing of sensitive data, such as your sexual orientation.
Program Registration Information
If you join our Creator Notification Program or certain other optional IMVU programs, we require additional information to ensure payment processing and we will also ask you for your:
Real name
Postal address
Phone number
Driver’s license or other government-issued photo identification.
Tax ID number, and tax reporting forms
We will use this information to administer the Creator Notification Program or other programs for which you have registered, and may use this information to send you notices and information as may be required or necessary.
Transaction Information
If you wish to join our VIP program, verify your age, add credits to your account, purchase rights to use a particular avatar name, earn free credits, or purchase VCOIN, or other virtual goods or services, we request certain personal information from you in order to verify your identity for fraud detection, for billing purposes, for compliance with applicable laws, and for filling your orders. You may be required to provide your:
Contact information, including name, email, and billing address
Financial information, including credit card number, expiration date, PayPal account information, or a selfie (where applicable). If you use an identity-linked purchase tool (such as PayPal), we will retain an encrypted token of the purchase for our records.
Government-issued photo identification
Additionally, as explained below, we automatically collect and process information related to your purchases and orders for other internal business purposes, such as credits purchased or earned, the virtual goods you create, sell and/or purchase, the virtual price for such virtual goods, and the profit you make by selling such virtual goods.  This is part of the Usage Information (defined below) that we collect.  Information relating to blockchain transactions, including NFT ownership, purchase information including time and purchase price, and sale information including time and sale price, will necessarily be publicly available on the web blockchain.
Know Your Customer
We may require you to complete a “Know Your Customer” (KYC) process for certain activities, including certain actions relating to Together Labs’ block-chain based currencies such as VCOIN and VCORE for purposes of legal and regulatory compliance. IMVU relies upon, and such KYC process must be completed through, a third-party services provider, Uphold. Uphold’s Privacy and Data Privacy policy can be found
here.
Uphold’s KYC Process will ask you to provide/complete the following:
Your current residential address
A government-issued photo identification such as a driver’s license or passport
Take a live selfie using your computer or mobile device for purposes of identity confirmation
Email Communications
When you sign up for the Services, you may choose to opt in to receiving IMVU marketing email. In addition, we may send you email updates from time to time. Examples include when someone adds you as a friend, when you get a new message from one of your friends, or when a user is not your friend but sends you a message. If you communicate with us via email, we will process the content of the communication in order to respond to your inquiry.
If you do not wish to receive certain types of email communications, you may click
here
or set your preference under “Email” in your
Account Settings
to change your options. You may not opt out of certain communications, such as those that update you about our terms or inform you of suspicious activity on your account.
Uploaded Content Information
You may upload photos and other content on the Services (for example, to use as your avatar image or for your Feed). We process this information if you choose to upload content to the Services.
Please be aware that, if you do this, any photos and other content that you post may be viewed by other users of the Services.
You may remove your photo(s), videos, and other content at any time by going to your account, selecting your content, and deleting content. Please note that you may not upload content about another individual unless you have their express permission to do so.
If you are a minor between the ages of 13 and 17, you may contact us via our
Help Center
to remove certain content that you have submitted on the Services.
Chat and Blog Information
If you use the chat functionality, message board, or instant messages on the Services, you should be aware that any personal information you submit there can be read, collected, or used by IMVU and other users of these forums, and could be used to send you unsolicited messages.
We are not responsible for the personal or other information about you or anyone else that you choose to submit in these forums.
We encourage you not to post any sensitive information when using the chat functionality, instant messages, or message board.
If you choose to subscribe to our Feed or Discussions by email, we will collect your email address, and we will use your email address to send you an email verification as well as email messages if people comment on the same photo or thread as you. You may unsubscribe to this at any time by following the instructions included in each email communication or by updating your subscription settings
here.
Voice Data
If you use the functionality that enables you to speak with other users on the Services, we will use a tracking pixel, agent or other visitor identification technology that collects, uses, shares and stores data about you, including your voice. You should be aware that any personal information, including your voice itself, that you reveal in any discussions can be heard by other users of these forums with whom you interact. We encourage you not to reveal any sensitive information when using this functionality. We use this voice data for security purposes and to detect fraud and illegal activities. Our third party service provider of the voice functionality, Unity, may record your voice, and otherwise collect and use your personal information as set forth in the
Unity Privacy Policy.
Information Collected Indirectly
anchor
Device and Usage Information
We, or authorized third parties, collect some personal information, including Device Information, and Usage Information, as well as Location Data as described below, by automated means using cookies, web beacons, software developer kits (“SDK”) and server logs for analytic purposes. For more information on our use of these technologies and the data that they collect, see the
Cookie Notice
.
When you download, use, or interact with the Services, even if you do not have an account, we, or authorized third parties (such as service providers or, as explained
below
, External Ad Partners), collect information about your use of the Services via your device. This information consists of:
Information about your device (“Device Information”):
information about the devices and software you use to access the Services – primarily the internet browser or mobile device that you use, the website or source that linked or referred you to the Services, your IP address or device ID (or other persistent identifier that uniquely identifies your computer or mobile device on the Internet), the operating system of your computer or mobile device, device screen size, and other similar technical information.
Information about how you use the Services (“Usage Information“):
information about your interactions with the Services, including access dates and times, hardware and software information, device event information, crash data, and cookie data. This information allows us to understand the screens that you view, how you have used the Services (which may include administrative and support communications with us or whether you have clicked on third party links), your interactions on the Services (including friend activity, blocked users, purchases and your preferences), and other actions on the Services. We, or our authorized third parties, automatically collect log data when you access and use the Services, even if you have not created an account or logged in. We use this information to administer and improve the Services, analyze trends, track users’ use of the Services, and gather broad demographic information for aggregate use.
Information about your location (“Location Data“):
we, or authorized third parties, collect your location data, including city, metro code, zip code, state, country, latitude and longitude, and area code through your IP address. To disable the collection of precise location information from your mobile device through the Services, you can access your mobile device settings and choose to limit that collection.
Information from Third Parties
In some instances, we process personal information from third parties, which consists of:
Data from our partners and service providers, such as Transaction Information from providers of payment services
Data from our External Ad Partners (described
here
).
Why We Collect Your Personal Information and How We Use It
We, or our authorized partners, collect and process personal information in order to:
Provide you the Services
Ensure that our Services are operational and optimized for user experience, as well as enforce our Terms of Use with you if necessary
Improve the content and general administration of the Services, including to detect harmful content or content that otherwise violates our policies
Enhance user experience, including to provide you with customer support or to personalize your experience
Detect fraud, illegal activities, or security breaches
Enable you to participate in our Creator Notification Program or other programs
Enable third parties to deliver advertising to you, and enable you to participate in promotions and surveys, for monetization purposes
Provide you with notices regarding goods or services that you have purchased or may wish to purchase in the future including, in some cases, to send you direct marketing communications regarding IMVU’s products and services that we may think are of interest to you
Respond to your queries and requests, or otherwise communicate directly with you
Perform system maintenance and upgrades, and enable new features
Conduct statistical analyses and analytics
Understand how you access and use the Services in order to provide technical functionality, develop new products and services, and analyze your use of the Services, such as your interaction with applications, advertising, products, and services that are made available, linked to, or offered through the Services
Provide information to regulatory bodies when legally required
For California residents,
please visit this
Section
for more information on specific purposes of collection for each category of personal information collected in the past 12 months
For individuals located in the EEA or the U.K.,
please visit this
Section
for more information on our legal bases for processing.
Analytics
With the Device and Usage Information collected by us or our third party analytics services, such as Google Analytics, we generate and process “Aggregated Information”, which includes statistical or demographic data. Aggregated Information may be derived from personal data, but is not considered personal data under the law if it does not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. For example, we may track the total number of visitors to our Services or the number of visitors to each page of our Services, and we may aggregate usage data to calculate the percentage of users accessing a specific feature of the Services and analyze this data for trends and statistics.
However, if we combine or connect Aggregated Information with your personal data so that it can directly or indirectly identify you, we treat the combined data as personal data, which will be processed in accordance with this Privacy Notice.
For more information on our use of cookies and similar technologies for analytics purposes, please see our
Cookie Notice
.
anchor
Behavioral Advertising & Monetization
IMVU partners with third party advertisers, ad server companies, and ad networks (collectively, “External Ad Partners”) for advertising and monetization purposes, as well as marketing affiliates for specific offers (“Offerwall Providers”).  For a list of our External Ad Partners and Offerwall Providers, please see
here
External Ad Partners, and in some cases Offerwall Providers, use cookies, beacons, tags, tracking pixels, and similar tracking technologies to collect certain Device Information and Usage Information, including IP address device ID and Location Data described
here
. With this information and, in some cases, information about your visits to other websites and services, External Ad Partners provide advertisements on and off the Services about goods and services that are tailored to your interests. This is also referred to as “behavioral” or “targeted” advertising because External Ad Partners and Offerwall Partners track your activity on and off the Services in order to deliver targeted advertising based on your activity. In addition, the information that External Ad Partners and Offerwall Partners collect from our Services may be combined with other information from other sources and be used to build profiles on you and other individuals for the purposes of delivering targeted advertising.
If you elect to participate in the “Free Credits” or “Earn Credits” functionality and you opt in, note that relevant Offerwall Providers may also track performance and use data relating to the content as well as how you use the Services. For California residents, please click
here
for more information.
What does this mean?
When you click on a link to an External Ad Partners on our Services, that External Ad Partner will drop a cookie (or similar tracking technologies) to capture and collect Device and Usage Information, so that it can track your activity on the Services, unless you are in the EEA or the U.K. and have not opted in or have blocked cookies as described below. This information may be combined with other information from other sources and be used to deliver targeted advertising.
For individuals in the EEA or the U.K.: you will be asked to opt-in to behavioral advertising and may manage your consent at any time by visiting
here
.
For individuals in California, Colorado, Utah, Virginia, or Connecticut, you can opt-out from third party behavioral advertising
here:
in accordance with applicable laws and regulations.
Please note that even if you opt-out of behavioral advertising, you still may see other advertising when using the Services, but such advertising will not be based on your behavior.
It is important to understand that when External Ad Partners and/or Offerwall Providers collect your personal information through our Services, they may further disclose and share this information with many other companies within the online advertising ecosystem, with which neither IMVU, nor its users, has a direct relationship. While IMVU controls how it uses your personal information on its Services, these other companies within the online advertising ecosystem may use your personal information to create a profile of you, or for other purposes as they determine and control.
For more information about interest-based advertising, please visit the Network Advertising Initiative website and/or the Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”) Self-Regulatory Program for Online Behavioral Advertising website. To learn more about interest-based advertising in mobile apps and to opt out of this type of advertising by third parties that participate in the DAA’s AppChoices tool, please use this link to download the version of AppChoices for your device. Please note that any opt-out choice you exercise through these programs will apply to interest-based advertising by the third parties you select, but will still allow the collection of data for other purposes, including research, analytics, and internal operations. You may also continue to receive advertising, but that advertising may be less relevant to your interests.
You may have more options depending on your mobile device and operating system. For example, most device operating systems (e.g., iOS for Apple phones, Android for Android devices) provide their own instructions on how to limit or prevent the delivery of tailored in-application advertisements. You may review the support materials and/or the privacy settings for the respective operating systems to learn more about these features and how they apply to tailored in-app advertisements.
Please visit our
Cookie Notice
for more information on the types of cookies that are used by us and our External Ad Partners within the Services, as well as information on your choices and how to opt out.
Youtube
When you use a feature on the Services that allows you to search YouTube for video content to watch and play on the Service, you are using a third-party linked service from Google known as YouTube API Services.  Google collects and uses your personal information as set forth in the Google Privacy Policy at
http://www.google.com/policies/privacy
.
When you use this feature, we may collect your playlist title, the video titles and the video descriptions from within your playlist. If we do so, you can revoke our access to this information that we receive from Google through your use of the YouTube API via the Google security settings page at
https://security.google.com/settings/security/permissions
.
Managing Your Preferences
Access to, Portability of, Correction of, Deletion of, and Appeals concerning Your Personal Data
If and as permitted by applicable laws, you can (i) request more information about the personal information we hold about you. (ii) if you believe that any personal information we are holding about you is incorrect or incomplete, you can request that we correct or supplement such data. (iii) equest the deletion of the personal information that we hold; and/or (iv) appeal any decisions we’ve made about the personal information or requests you’ve made concerning such personal information.  For more information about how to exercise these rights, you may contact us as provided
here.
Direct Marketing
IMVU enables you to manage your marketing preferences by clicking on a link contained in each electronic communication to you. You can also use your preference settings to inform us of how you would like to receive marketing communications. Updates to your privacy preference information will be submitted once you have confirmed your changes.
You can also opt out of further direct marketing emails by clicking on the link at the end of each email message that you receive from us.
anchor
Disclosure of Your Personal Information
We disclose your personal information under certain circumstances, such as to our service providers or in the event of a sale, as further described below.
Third Parties and Service Providers
IMVU may share users’ information with our third party agents, contractors, or service providers who are hired to perform services on IMVU’s behalf to assist with certain business purposes. These providers may operate or support certain functions of the Services. Below is a list of categories of service providers that we may use to perform these functions (subject to change):
Analytics services
Customer support services
Surveys and promotions
Billing services and payment gateway providers
Hosting and content delivery network services
Communication and content review tools
Professional service providers, such as auditors, lawyers, consultants, accountants and insurers
Service providers process your personal information for the specific purpose of providing their services to us (and in accordance with our instructions).
As noted above, we also work with and disclose information to third parties, namely External Ad Partners and Offerwall Providers. Third parties may use your personal information for their own commercial purposes, to the extent you have not opted-in (in the EU) or opted-out.
anchor
LiveRamp
One service provider/partner with whom we may share your personal information is LiveRamp. Upon receipt of your personal information, LiveRamp returns an online identification code that we may store in our first-party cookie for our use in online, in-app, and cross-channel advertising and it may be shared with advertising companies to enable interest-based and targeted advertising. To learn more about LiveRamp’s privacy practices, please click
here
. To opt out from LiveRamp’s personal information processing activities, please click
here.
Business Transfers
As we continue to grow, we may purchase websites, applications, subsidiaries, or other businesses or business units. Alternatively, we may sell businesses or business units, merge with other entities, obtain financing, and/or sell assets or stock, in some cases, as part of a reorganization or liquidation in bankruptcy. In order to evaluate and/or as part of these transactions, we may transfer your personal information to a successor entity upon a merger, consolidation, or other corporate reorganization in which IMVU participates, to investors and/or to a purchaser or acquirer of all or a portion of IMVU’s assets, bankruptcy included.
Public Forums and Community Areas
We offer users the ability to use forums and similar means of public discussion. If you use any messaging, posting, voice, or chat functions on IMVU, you should be aware that any personal information submitted there will be available to anyone who has access to that content, including other users, and can be read, collected, or used by other users of these forums, and could be used to send unsolicited messages. We are not responsible for how other individuals use the information posted in this manner.
Affiliates
We may disclose your personal information to our corporate affiliates to assist us with our business operations.
Anonymized Information
We share anonymized, aggregated, automatically-collected, or otherwise non-personal information with third parties for various purposes, including (i) compliance with reporting obligations; (ii) business or marketing purposes; (iii) assistance for us and other parties in understanding our users’ interests, habits, and usage patterns for certain programs, content, services, advertisements, promotions, and/or functionality available through the Services. We do not share personal information about you in this case.
anchor
Legal Obligations and Security
IMVU may preserve or disclose your personal information in limited circumstances (other than as set forth in this Privacy Notice), including: (i) with your consent; (ii) when we have a good faith belief it is required by law, such as pursuant to a valid subpoena, warrant, or other judicial or administrative order (as further explained below); (iii) to protect the safety of any person; (iv) to protect the safety or security of our Services or to prevent spam, abuse, or other malicious activity of actors with respect to the Services; or (v) to protect our rights or property or the rights or property of those who use the Services.
If we are required to disclose personal information by law, such as pursuant to a subpoena, warrant, or other judicial or administrative order, our policy is to respond to requests that are properly issued by law enforcement within the United States or via mutual legal assistance mechanism (such as a treaty). However, if we receive information that provides us with a good faith belief that there is an exigent emergency involving the danger of death or serious physical injury to a person, we may provide information to law enforcement trying to prevent or mitigate the danger (if we have it), which will be determined on a case-by-case basis.
Note: when interacting with other users, you are responsible for the personal information that you disclose and/or make public.
Payment Processing
We use third party, PCI-compliant payment processors, which collect payment information on our behalf in order to complete transactions. While we receive payment confirmation when a user makes a purchase, we do not have access to, and are unable to process, your credit card information. We do, however, keep a record of completed transactions, as explained here.
Social Media
IMVU maintains an online presence on social media platforms (“Social Media Platforms”) such as Instagram, Twitter or Facebook, to provide information about our Services and communicate with users and/or visitors to those pages or accounts. When you interact or post to our account, we process your personal information. In some cases, the Social Media Platforms are service providers or processors. In other cases, such as Facebook, we are jointly responsible for the processing, as explained in the section titled Facebook Products and Joint Controllership for Individuals in the EEA.
Third-Party Sign-In
You may register to join or log in to the Services directly or by using a third-party platform sign-in such as Apple Sign-in or Facebook Login.  If you choose to sign in to the Services through a third-party platform, the third-party platform may collect personal information about you and your activity, depending on how you have adjusted your privacy settings with that third-party platform. Your use of third-party sign-in for authentication purposes is subject to the privacy policies of those platforms. For individuals in the EEA, please review the section titled Facebook Products and Joint Controllership for Individuals in the EEA for information on our use of Facebook Products, including Facebook Login.
Third Party Offers
If you wish to complete a third-party offer in order to earn free credits on the Services with an Offerwall Provider on the Site, you will be redirected to the Offerwall Provider’s website for the offer you wish to complete.  In some cases, pages that you visit may have the look and feel of our Services (i.e., www.imvu.com).  IMVU and our Offerwall Providers exchange your customer identification number, IP address and/or username once an offer has been completed so that we may match such information to your account in order to credit your account with the credits you have earned from the Offerwall Provider(s) for completing their offer(s). For information on how Offerwall Providers collect and use your information in exchange for credits, please refer to their respective privacy policies and their policies on addressing financial incentives for California residents.
Please note that some pages may have the look and feel of our Services (i.e.,
www.imvu.com
.
            ), however these pages are served by a third party and our Privacy Notice does not apply to the information collected on these co-branded sites. You should read the privacy policy or statement of our co-branded partner on the co-branded site.
Do Not Track
IMVU does not track individuals across multiple platforms and does not respond to “Do Not Track” signals. To learn more, visit www.allaboutdnt.com. However, certain third parties may collect information about your online activities over time and across different Internet websites or online services when you use our Services (such as via cookies).
Protecting Your Personal Information
No method of transmission over the Internet (or method of electronic storage) is 100% secure, however we take steps that are reasonably necessary to securely provide our Services. We have put in place reasonably appropriate security measures designed to prevent your personal data from being accidentally lost, used or accessed in an unauthorized way, altered, or disclosed. We limit access to personal data only to those employees, agents, contractors, and the third parties who have a business need-to-know.
We also have procedures in place to deal with any suspected data security breach. If required, we will notify you and any applicable regulator of a suspected data security breach. We also require those parties to whom we transfer your personal information to provide acceptable standards of security.
International Transfers
The Services are hosted and operated in the United States (“U.S.”) through IMVU, its affiliates, and its service providers.  Laws in the U.S. may differ from the laws where you reside and may be less protective than the laws of your country or region, such as the GDPR.
By using the Services, you consent and acknowledge that any personal data about you, regardless of whether provided by you or obtained from a third party, is being provided to IMVU in the U.S. and will be hosted on the U.S. services by IMVU and/or its service providers, and you authorize IMVU and/or its service providers to transfer, store and process your information to and in the U.S. and possibly other countries.
Although by using our Services you automatically send your personal data to the U.S., which is not deemed an “adequate” jurisdiction by the European Union for data transfers, we adhere to the Standard Contractual Clauses and require parties to whom we disclose your information to adhere to the Standard Contractual Clauses to the extent not located in the EEA.
anchor
How To Contact Us About Privacy
If you have any questions regarding this Privacy Notice please contact IMVU by submitting a case here and selecting “Privacy and Safety” as a case category or via mail at:
Privacy Officer
IMVU, LLC
PO Box 2772
Redwood City, CA 94063
email:
privacy@imvu.com
Additionally, for individuals located in the EEA or the U.K., please see the section below.
anchor
Notice to Nevada Consumers
We do not sell your personal information within the scope of, and according to the defined meaning of a “sale” under, NRS 603A.
anchor
Additional Information for Individuals in the EEA and the U.K.
Categories of Recipients of Personal Data
The categories of recipients of Personal Data with whom we may share your personal data are listed in
Disclosure of Your Personal Information
.
             above.
Purpose of the Processing and Legal Bases
IMVU processes your personal information for a number of different purposes. Some are essential for us to provide the Services you use or to fulfill our legal obligations, some help us run the Services efficiently and effectively, and some enable us to provide you with more relevant and personalized offers and information. In all cases we must have a reason and a legal ground for processing your personal information. Some of the most common legal grounds we rely on are briefly explained below.
Performance of a Contract:
We may process your personal data for the purpose of performing under the terms of a contract to which you are a party - in other words, your ability to use the Services. For instance, if you purchase virtual items on the Services, we will process your data in order to carry out the payment transaction.
Legitimate Interests
We may process personal data where it is necessary for our legitimate business interests, but only to the extent that they are not outweighed by your own interests or fundamental rights and freedoms. We generally rely on legitimate interests to provide and maintain Services that work well and securely, to carry out fraud prevention, and to generally improve the Services. When we rely on this legal basis, if required, we will carry out a legitimate interest assessment to ensure we consider and balance any potential impact on you (both positive and negative), and your rights under data protection laws.
Consent:
IMVU will rely on consent where it is required, such as when we are asking you to confirm your marketing preferences or when you submit sensitive data. When we rely on consent, you will be asked to confirm that you give your permission to IMVU to process your personal data. You have the right to withdraw your consent at any time if you no longer want to be part of the IMVU processing activity where your consent was sought.
Legal Obligation
IMVU will on occasion be under a legal obligation to obtain and disclose your personal data or may cooperate in a legal or governmental investigation. Where possible, we will notify you when processing your data due to a legal obligation; however, this may not always be possible. IMVU may determine that it needs to provide your data in order to prevent criminal activity or help to detect criminal activity; in which case, we may share information with law enforcement without notifying you. It is essential that IMVU complies with its legal, regulatory, and contractual requirements, so if you object to this processing, IMVU will not be able to provide its Services to you.
The following breakdown illustrates in more detail how the above legal bases for processing apply to our primary purposes for processing different types of personal data. Please note that, with respect to legal bases, we only rely on one basis for each specific processing activity, but for purposes of this following breakdown, we may list more than one, which will then depend on the specific type of processing and circumstances. We have broken each processing activity by legal bases and categories of personal data processed:
Provide you access to, and use of, the Services, including registering you for the Services and enabling purchases and orders
[Legal Basis: Performance of a Contract] [Personal Data: Account Registration Information, Program Registration Information, Device & Usage Information, Transaction Information, Email Communications, Information from Third Parties]
Enable you to participate in our Creator Notification program or other programs
[Legal Basis: Legitimate Interests or Consent, depending on the circumstances] [Personal Data: Account Registration Information, Program Registration Information, Device & Usage Information, Email Communications, Uploaded Content Information, Chat and Blog Information, Voice Data, Transaction Information, Information from Third Parties]
Ensure that our Services are operational and optimized for user experience, as well as to enforce our Terms of Use with you if necessary
[Legal Basis: Legitimate Interests or Performance of a Contract, depending on the specific use] [Personal Data: Account Registration Information, Program Registration Information, Device & Usage Information, Uploaded Content Information, Email Communications, Information from Third Parties, Voice Data, Chat and Blog Information, Transaction Information]
Improve the content and general administration of the Services
[Legal Basis: Legitimate Interests] [Personal Data: Account Registration Information, Program Registration Information, Voice Data, Chat and Blog Information, Device & Usage Information]
Enhance user experience, including to provide you with customer support or to personalize your experience
[Legal Basis: Legitimate Interests or Performance of a Contract, depending on the specific use] [Personal Data: Account Registration Information, Program Registration Information, Device & Usage Information, Uploaded Content Information, Email Communications, Information from Third Parties, Transaction Information]
Detect fraud, illegal activities, or security breaches
[Legal Basis: Legitimate Interests] [Personal Data: Account Registration Information, Program Registration Information, Device & Usage Information, Information from Third Parties, Transaction Information, Voice Data, and Chat and Blog Information]
Enable third parties to deliver advertising to you, and to enable you to participate in promotions and surveys for monetization purposes
[Legal Basis: Legitimate Interests or Consent, depending on the specific circumstances] [Personal Data: Account Registration Information, Device & Usage Information, Transaction Information]
Provide you with notices regarding goods or services that you have purchased or may wish to purchase in the future
[Legal Basis: Legitimate Interests, Consent, or Performance of a Contract, depending on the specific use] [Personal Data: Account Registration Information, Program Registration Information, Device & Usage Information, Uploaded Content Information, Email Communications, Information from Third Parties, Transaction Information]
Respond to your queries and requests, or otherwise communicate directly with you
[Legal Basis: Legitimate Interests or Performance of a Contract, depending on the specific use] [Personal Data: Account Registration Information, Program Registration Information, Device & Usage Information, Email Communications, Transaction Information]
Perform system maintenance and upgrades, and enable new features
[Legal Basis: Legitimate Interests] [Personal Data: Account Registration Information, Program Registration Information, Device & Usage Information]
Conduct statistical analyses and analytics
[Legal Basis: Legitimate Interests or Consent, depending on the circumstances] [Personal Data: Device & Usage Information, Email Communications, Information from Third Parties, Transaction Information]
Understand how you access and use the Services in order to provide technical functionality, to develop new products and services, and to analyze your use of the Services, such as your interaction with applications, advertising, products, and services that are made available, linked to, or offered through the Services including through the use of Social Media Platforms
[Legal Basis: Legitimate Interests or Consent, depending on the circumstances] [Personal Data: Account Registration Information, Program Registration Information, Device & Usage Information, Email Communications, Uploaded Content Information, Chat and Blog Information, Voice Data, Transaction Information, Information from Third Parties]
Provide information to regulatory bodies when legally required, and only as outlined in this Privacy Notice
[Legal Basis: Compliance with a Legal Obligations] [Personal Data: Only such information as may be required]
How Long Do We Keep Your Personal Data?
We use the following criteria to determine our retention periods: the amount, nature and sensitivity of your information, the reasons for which we collect and process your personal data, the length of time we have an ongoing relationship with you and provide you with access to our Services, and applicable legal requirements. We will retain personal information we collect from you where we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (for example, to comply with applicable legal, tax, or accounting requirements), when we are unable to reasonably verify your identity, or as may otherwise be required under GDPR. Additionally, we cannot delete information when it is needed for the establishment, exercise, or defense of legal claims (also known as a “litigation hold”). In this case, the information must be retained as long as needed for exercising respective potential legal claims.
When we have no ongoing business need to process your personal information, we will either delete or anonymize it or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal information has been stored in backup archives), we will securely store your personal information and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible. If you have questions about, or need further information concerning, our data retention periods, please send an email at
privacy@imvu.com
.
Staying in Control of Your Information: Your Rights
If you are in the EEA or the U.K., you have certain rights in relation to your personal data, including those set forth below. Please note that in some circumstances, we may not be able to fully comply with your request, such as if it is frivolous or extremely impractical, if it jeopardizes the rights of others, if an exception applies, or if it is not required by law, but in those circumstances, we will still respond to notify you of such a decision. In some cases, we may also need you to provide us with additional information, which may include personal data, if necessary to verify your identity and the nature of your request.
Access
: You can request more information about the personal data we hold about you and request a copy of such personal data.
Rectification
: If you believe that any personal data we are holding about you is incorrect or incomplete, you can request that we correct or supplement such data.
Erasure
: You can request that we erase some or all of your personal data from our systems.
Withdrawal of Consent
: If we are processing your personal data based on your consent (as indicated at the time of collection of such data), you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time. Please note, however, that if you exercise this right, you may have to then provide consent on a case-by-case basis for the use or disclosure of certain of your personal data, if such use or disclosure is necessary to enable you to utilize some or all of our Services.
Portability
: You can ask for a copy of your personal data in a machine-readable format. You can also request that we transmit the data to another controller where technically feasible.
Objection
: You can contact us to let us know that you object to the further use or disclosure of your personal data for certain purposes, such as for direct marketing purposes.
Restriction of Processing
: You can ask us to restrict further processing of your personal data.
You will not have to pay a fee to access your personal data (or to exercise any of the other rights) unless your request is clearly unfounded, repetitive, or excessive. Alternatively, we may refuse to comply with your request under those circumstances.
We will respond to all legitimate requests within one month. Occasionally, it may take us longer than a month if your request is particularly complex or you have made a number of requests. In this case, we will notify you and keep you updated as required by law.
In addition, if you no longer wish to receive our marketing/promotional information, we remind you that you may withdraw your consent to direct marketing at any time directly from the unsubscribe link included in each electronic marketing message we send to you. If you do so, we will promptly update our databases, and will take all reasonable steps to meet your request at the earliest possible opportunity, but we may continue to contact you to the extent necessary for the purposes of providing our Services.
Finally, you have the right to make a complaint at any time to the supervisory authority for data protection issues in your country of residence. A list of Supervisory Authorities is available here:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
.  We would, however, appreciate the chance to address your concerns before you approach the supervisory authority, so please contact us directly first.
Contacting our Representative in the EEA or the U.K.
If you are in the EEA
: IMVU has appointed the European Data Protection Office (EDPO) as its European Representative pursuant to Article 27 of the GDPR. You can contact EDPO regarding matters pertaining to the GDPR:
by using EDPO’s online request form: https://edpo.com/gdpr-data-request/
by writing to EDPO at Avenue Huart Hamoir 71, 1030 Brussels, Belgium
If you are in the U.K.
: IMVU has appointed EDPO UK Ltd as its representative in the U.K. pursuant to the Data Protection Act 2018 (“U.K. GDPR”). You can contact EDPO UK regarding matters pertaining to the U.K. GDPR:
by using EDPO’s online request form: https://edpo.com/uk-gdpr-data-request/
by writing to EDPO UK at 8 Northumberland Avenue, London WC2N 5BY, United Kingdom
Facebook Products and Joint Controllership for Individuals in the EEA
Sometimes, IMVU acts as a ‘joint controller’ with certain third parties, namely certain social media sites, such as Facebook and Pangle. When IMVU and a partner act as joint controllers, you (as a data subject) may exercise your rights against IMVU and/or the third party. For a list of joint controller relationships, please contact us at
privacy@imvu.com
.
We use Facebook’s products and services (“Facebook Products”) in different ways:
You may login to the Services using Facebook Login
To advertise our Services, as well as to communicate with interested parties or users, we also have a presence on Facebook (including Instagram)
We use Facebook’s social plugins as explained here
With respect to our use of Facebook Products, we are jointly responsible with Facebook Ireland for the processing activities (“Joint Processing”):
Facebook Ireland Ltd.,
4 Grand Canal Square, Grand Canal Harbor
Dublin 2, Ireland
Information about the personal data that is collected from you by Facebook, as well as how and why it is processed by Facebook, can be found at https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy.
IMVU and Facebook have entered into an agreement in order to determine the respective responsibilities for compliance with our obligations in connection with the Joint Processing within the meaning of the GDPR. This joint controller agreement, which sets out the reciprocal obligations, is available here.
IMVU’s legal basis for processing your personal data via Facebook Products is our legitimate interest in increasing and analyzing the communication, sales, and promotion of Services. Our legal basis may also be your consent, which may be revoked at any time.
Please note that Facebook Ireland is responsible for enabling data subjects’ rights under Articles 15-20 of the GDPR with regard to the personal data stored by Facebook Ireland in connection with the Joint Processing, as further described in Facebook’s privacy policy. To exercise your rights, please go to your Facebook settings or contact Facebook as set forth in its privacy policy.
It cannot be excluded that some processing by Facebook Ireland Ltd. will also take place in the United States by Facebook Inc.
Regarding ads served by Pangle. Pangle is a joint controller of your Personal Data. Pangle’s Technology enables the collection and transmission of Personal Data as set forth in Pangle’s privacy policy located at
https://www.pangleglobal.com/privacy/enduser-en
.  You can find out how to exercise your rights in relation to Pangle in the Pangle privacy policy.
anchor
Additional Information for California Residents
This Privacy Notice for California Residents (“California Privacy Notice”) supplements the information contained in the Privacy Notice and applies solely to all visitors, users, and others who reside in the State of California (“Consumers”). We have created this California Privacy Notice in order to comply with the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (“CCPA”) and the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 (“CPRA”).
Categories of Information We Collect
IMVU’s Services collect personal information as that term is defined in CCPA. Within the last twelve (12) months, IMVU has collected the following categories of personal information from or about Consumers (note that the lettered categories are according to lettering in the CCPA):
A. Identifiers
, such as a real name, unique personal identifier, online identifier, IP Address, email address, or account name
B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records Statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e))
, such as a name, signature or telephone number
C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
, such as age or gender
D. Commercial information
, such as records of products purchased, obtained, or considered, or other purchasing or consuming histories or tendencies
F. Internet or other similar network activity
, such as browsing history or information on a Consumer’s interaction with a website or application.
G. Geolocation data
, such as physical location.
K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
, such as profile information reflecting a person’s preferences.
Personal information does not include:
Publicly available information from government records.
Deidentified or aggregated Consumer information.
Certain other information that is already regulated by other laws or regulations.
Information that is specifically exempt from the scope of the CCPA.
Categories of Sources of Personal Information
As explained in more detail
here
, IMVU obtains the categories of personal information listed above from the following categories of sources:
Directly from you.
For example, when you sign up to use the Services. This includes the following categories of personal information:
A. Identifiers
B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e))
C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
D. Commercial information
G. Geolocation data
Indirectly.
For example, from observing your actions on our Services, including by the use of cookies or from third parties. This includes the following categories of personal information:
D. Commercial information
F. Internet or other similar network activity
G. Geolocation data
K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
By observing Consumers’ behavior through their purchases and activity on the Site, Platform and Services.
This includes the following categories of personal information:
F. Internet or other similar network activity
G. Geolocation data
K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
Use of Personal Information
We may use, or disclose the personal information we collect for one or more of the following business purposes:
Provide you access to, and use of, the Services, including registering you for the Services and enabling purchases and orders:
A. Identifiers; B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)); C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law; D. Commercial information; F. Internet or other similar network activity; G. Geolocation data; K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
Enable you to participate in our Creator Notification program or other programs:
A. Identifiers; B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)); C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law; D. Commercial information; F. Internet or other similar network activity; G. Geolocation data;  K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
Ensure that our Services are operational and optimized for user experience, as well as to enforce our terms of use with you if necessary:
A. Identifiers; B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)); C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law; D. Commercial information; F. Internet or other similar network activity; G. Geolocation data
Improve the content and general administration of the Services:
D. Commercial information; F. Internet or other similar network activity; G. Geolocation data;  K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
Enhance user experience, including to provide you with customer support or to personalize your experience:
A. Identifiers; B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)); D. Commercial information; F. Internet or other similar network activity
Detect fraud, illegal activities, harmful content, or security breaches:
A. Identifiers; B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e)); C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law; D. Commercial information; F. Internet or other similar network activity
Enable third parties to deliver advertising to you, and to enable you to participate in promotions and surveys, for monetization purposes:
D. Commercial information; F. Internet or other similar network activity; K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
Provide you with notices regarding goods or services that you have purchased or may wish to purchase in the future:
A. Identifiers; D. Commercial information; F. Internet or other similar network activity; K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
Perform system maintenance and upgrades, and enable new features:
F. Internet or other similar network activity
Conduct statistical analyses and analytics:
D. Commercial information; F. Internet or other similar network activity
Understand how you access and use the Services in order to provide technical functionality, develop new products and services, and analyze your use of the Services, such as your interaction with applications, advertising, products, and services that are made available, linked to, or offered through the Services (this includes through the use of Social Media Platforms):
A. Identifiers; D. Commercial information; F. Internet or other similar network activity; K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
Provide information to regulatory bodies when legally required, and only as outlined in this Privacy Notice:
Any category of personal information as may be required and only as outlined in this Privacy Notice
Disclosure of Personal Information
IMVU may disclose your personal information to a third party for a business purpose. When we disclose personal information for a business purpose, we enter into a contract that describes the purpose and requires the recipient to both keep that personal information confidential and not use it for any purpose except performing the services for us. As explained in more detail
above
, we also share your personal information with certain categories of third parties who assist us in providing our Services and with our business.
Disclosures of Personal Information
In the preceding 12 months, IMVU has disclosed the following categories of personal information for a business purpose:
A. Identifiers
B. Personal information categories listed in the California Customer Records statute (Cal. Civ. Code § 1798.80(e))
C. Protected classification characteristics under California or federal law
D. Commercial information
F. Internet or other similar network activity
G. Geolocation data
K. Inferences drawn from other personal information
We disclose your personal information for a business purpose to the following categories of service providers or third parties:
Companies that do things to help us provide the Services: hosting service providers, user engagement and customer support providers, certain analytics providers, payment service providers, communication tools;
Professional service providers, such as auditors, lawyers, consultants, accountants and insurers.
IMVU does not “sell” personal information as most people would typically understand that term. However, we do share personal information with or allow External Ad Partners to collect personal information about consumers through our Services to assist us with advertising. If you would like to opt-out of our sharing of your personal information with External Ad Partners for advertising purposes, please visit www.imvu.com/next/policyhub/ccpa/ or the section titled Advertising, Marketing & Monetization
above
.
Your Rights and Choices
The CCPA and CPRA provide Consumers with specific rights regarding their Personal Information, provided that we are able to verify their identities as explained
here
. This Section describes your rights and explains how to exercise those rights.
As explained above, if you would like to opt-out of us sharing your personal information with External Ad Partners for advertising purposes, please visit www.imvu.com/next/policyhub/ccpa/ or the section titled Advertising, Marketing & Monetization
above
.
Access to Specific Information and Data Portability Rights
You have the right to request that IMVU disclose certain information to you about our collection and use of your personal information over the past 12 months. Once we receive your request
and verify your identity
(see Exercising Access, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights)
, we will disclose such information to you.
Deletion Request Rights
You have the right to request that IMVU delete any of your personal information that we collected from you and retained, subject to certain exceptions. Once we receive your request
and verify your identity
(see Exercising Access, Data Portability, and Deletion Rights)
, we will delete (and direct our service providers to delete) your personal information from our records, unless an exception applies.
We may deny your deletion request if retaining the information is necessary for us or our service provider(s) for certain reasons as permitted and set forth in the CCPA.
anchor
Exercising Your Consumer Rights
Only you, or a person registered with the California Secretary of State that you authorize to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable Consumer request related to your personal information. You may also make a verifiable Consumer request on behalf of your minor child.
An authorized agent is a natural person or a business entity registered with the Secretary of State that a Consumer has authorized to act on his or her behalf. When a Consumer uses an authorized agent to submit a request to know or a request to delete, IMVU may require that the Consumer provide the authorized agent written permission to do so and verify his or her own identity directly with IMVU, unless the Consumer has provided the authorized agent with a valid power of attorney. IMVU may deny a request from an agent that does not submit proof that he or she has been authorized by the Consumer to act on his or her behalf.
To exercise the access, data portability, and deletion rights described above, please submit a verifiable Consumer request to us by either:
Logging into your IMVU account and navigating to
www.imvu.com/next/policyhub/ccpa/
; or
or emailing
privacy@imvu.com
.
You may only make a verifiable Consumer request for access or data portability twice within a 12-month period. The verifiable Consumer request must:
Provide sufficient information that allows us to reasonably verify you are the person about whom we collected personal information or an authorized representative.
Describe your request with sufficient detail that allows us to properly understand, evaluate, and respond to it.
We cannot respond to your request or provide you with personal information if we cannot verify your identity or authority to make the request and confirm the personal information relates to you.
Making a verifiable Consumer request does not require you to create an account with us. Please note that the methods for verification are set forth in the CCPA, which also requires us to consider a number of factors, such as the type, sensitivity, and value of the personal information or the risk of harm posed by unauthorized access or deletion, on a case-by-case basis.
We will only use personal information provided in a verifiable Consumer request to verify the requestor’s identity or authority to make the request.
Response Timing
We endeavor to respond to a verifiable Consumer request within the timeframes set forth in the CCPA.
Any disclosures we provide will only cover the 12-month period preceding our receipt of the verifiable Consumer’s request. If applicable, in our response, we will also explain the reasons we cannot comply with a request. For data portability requests, we will select a format to provide your personal information that is readily usable and should allow you to transmit the information from one entity to another entity without hindrance.
We do not charge a fee to process or respond to your verifiable Consumer request unless it is excessive, repetitive, or manifestly unfounded. If we determine that the request warrants a fee, we will tell you why we made that decision and provide you with a cost estimate before completing your request.
Non-Discrimination and Notice of Financial Incentives
We will not discriminate against you in a manner prohibited by the CCPA because you exercise your CCPA rights. Please note that to use our Services, we do require the collection of your personal information - for example, to sign you up or to complete a paid transaction. While you may request to delete your personal information under CCPA, such deletions may affect IMVU’s ability to offer the Services.
In addition, on our Services, our Offerwall Providers may offer you financial incentives, including, in some cases, in the form of IMVU credits, that are directly related to the value provided to the Offerwall Providers by the personal information for the collection, sale, retention, and use of your personal information as permitted by the CCPA. Please note that participating in incentive programs is entirely optional, you will have to affirmatively opt in to the program and you can opt out of each program by following the instructions in the applicable program description and terms as provided by the offer wall partner. The financial incentive programs and their terms are located on the offer wall or at the offer wall partner’s site when you click on an offer to participate in an offer.
Our Offerwall Providers determine what financial incentives and credits are provided to you, independently of IMVU, and as such are responsible for (a) determining the value of your personal information, (b) providing you with a proper notice of financial incentive under the CCPA, if applicable to them, as well as the ability to opt-in and subsequently opt-out, and (c) ensuring that they do not discriminate against you if you exercise your rights under the CCPA.
We may add or change incentive programs and/or their terms by posting notices on the program descriptions and terms linked to the above so check them regularly.
Other California Privacy Rights
California residents may request information about our disclosures of certain categories of personal information to third parties for such third parties’ direct marketing purposes. California residents may make such requests to us at
privacy@imvu.com
. We will provide a list of the categories of personal information disclosed to such third parties for their direct marketing purposes during the immediately preceding calendar year, along with the names and addresses or these third parties. This request may be made no more than once per calendar year. We reserve our right not to respond to requests submitted other than to the email specified in this section.
If you have any questions regarding this California Privacy Notice, please contact IMVU by submitting a case here and selecting “Privacy and Safety” as a case category or via mail at:
Privacy Officer
IMVU, LLC
PO Box 2772
Redwood City, CA 94063
email:
privacy@imvu.com
anchor
IMVU Cookie Notice
Last updated as of: January 10, 2022
This Cookie Notice explains how we use cookies in connection with the Services, and your related choices.
Capitalized terms used in this Cookie Notice but not defined herein will have the meanings given to them in IMVU’s Privacy Notice.
If you do not accept the use of these cookies, please disable them by following the instructions in this Cookie Notice - for instance, by clicking the Cookie Settings link (from our cookie banner and also available from the
button below
) if you are located in the “EEA” or the U.K. or by changing your browser settings so that cookies on the Services cannot be placed on your computer or mobile device.
What Are Cookies?
Like most websites, we use cookies and other standard Internet technologies to help us improve our Services. Cookies do lots of different jobs, like letting you navigate between pages efficiently, remembering your preferences, and generally improving the user experience. They can also help to ensure that advertisements you see online are more relevant to you and your interests.
A cookie is a small text file that is stored on a user’s computer for record-keeping purposes. When you visit, access or use the Services, we may by means of cookies, beacons, tags, scripts, and/or similar technologies automatically collect technical information, including Device and Usage Information and other similar technical information.
A cookie can be classified by its lifespan and the domain to which it belongs. With respect to lifespan, a cookie is either a
session cookie
, which is erased when the user closes the browser, or a
persistent cookie
, which remains on the user’s computer/device for a pre-defined period of time. As to the domain to which a cookie belongs, it is either a
first-party cookie
, which is set by IMVU, or a
third-party cookie
stored by a different domain
We use both session and persistent cookies, and enable first and third-party cookies. IMVU tracks users' use of the Services, but does not track users across third party websites.
Below is a more detailed description of how and why we use cookies.
How and Why do We Use Cookies?
Strictly Necessary Cookies
These cookies are necessary for the Services to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you, which amount to a request for access to our Services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in, or filling in forms. You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but, if you do, some parts of the Services will not work.
These cookies include:
prefer_alloy - Used to determine if you see IMVU Next or Core
alloy_landing_cookie - Used to determine if you see IMVU Next or Core
in_ux - Assigned to a unique experiment
osCsid - Session cookie; required for login to function
Google Analytics - Used to determine site visitor demographics and improve services based on user demand
Threat Metrix - Required for fraud checking
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our Services. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and to see how visitors navigate the Services. Performance cookies are used to help us with our analytics, including to:
Compile statistics and analytics about your use of, and interaction with the Services, including details about how and where our Services are accessed, how often you visit or use the Services, the date and time of your visits, your actions on the Services, and information regarding in-game activities, and other similar traffic, usage, and trend data
(see Device and Usage Information above).
These analytic tools allow us to better understand the functionality of our mobile software on your device and gain insights about how mobile software is used in order to improve your experience
Gather important functionality, testing, and performance data about our Services, including performance data related to the Services, such as networking activity, CPU load, and resource usage, among other relevant data
Moderate user behavior on the Services, such as protecting against payment fraud and other inappropriate activities.
We use third-party tools and technologies to help us gather this information. For instance, we use Google Analytics to collect and process certain analytics data with technologies such as tracking pixels.
These cookies include:
browser_session - Tracks statistics about your IMVU session
window_session - Tracks statistics about a specific IMVU window
imvu_avnm - stores your avatarname for display purposes
saved_locale - stores which language you prefer to see IMVU in
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set on our Services by our External Ad Partners for advertising purposes. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant advertisements on other sites.
What does this mean?
When you click on a link to an External Ad Partners on our Services, that External Partner will drop a cookie (or similar tracking technologies) to capture and collect Device and Usage Information, so that it can track your activity on the Services, unless you are a user in the EEA and have not opted in, or have blocked cookies as described in the Privacy Notice. This information may be combined with other information from other sources and be used to deliver targeted advertising.
These cookies include:
login_interstitial_seen - Tracks the last time you saw an interstitial, for aggregate analytics purposes
sncd - Tracks CIDs you have logged into, for detecting if a new account is an alt
nunu - Tracks if we believe you are a new new user
preLogID - Used to connect incoming users with their subsequent login or registration
imvua - Tracks which acquisition partner you came from
datetime_entered - Tracks when you first landed on our site
linkshare_site_id - If acquired through a specific partner, tracks which ad you followed
lpip - Stores the IP you hit a landing page with
Your Choices
Most web and mobile device browsers automatically accept cookies, but, if you prefer, you can change your browser to prevent that or to notify you each time a cookie is set. Some browser manufacturers provide comprehensive help relating to cookie management in their products. Please see your web browser provider’s settings for more information.
You can also learn more about cookies by visiting
www.allaboutcookies.org
, which includes additional useful information on cookies and how to block cookies using different types of browsers or mobile devices.
Please note, however, that by blocking or deleting all cookies used on the Services, you may not be able to take full advantage of the Services and you may not be able to properly log on to the Services.
In addition, the following tools enable you to adjust specific settings:
To opt out from Google Analytics on the Site, you can download a plug-in by clicking here, or visit Google’s privacy notices to learn more about their practices and/or adjusting your settings.
If you are interested in learning more about and/or opting out of targeted advertising, we encourage you to visit one of the advertising industry-developed opt-out pages:
NAI Opt-Out Page:
http://www.networkadvertising.org/choices
DAA Opt-Out Page: www.aboutads.info/choices or
http://www.youronlinechoices.com/
If you are located in the EEA, you may also opt-out of online behavioral advertising by visiting
https://www.edaa.eu/what-we-do/european-principles/
Please note that, while we provide these links, we do not have access to, or control over, these third parties’ use of cookies or other tracking technologies, other than as explained in this Privacy Notice. For California residents, please click
here
for more information.
If you do not wish to receive our personalized ads, please visit their opt out pages at the above links to learn about how you may opt out of receiving personalized ads from member companies.
Changes to this Cookie Notice
IMVU may update this Cookie Notice from time to time, at our sole discretion. If so, we will post an updated Cookie Notice within the Services. Changes, modifications, additions, or deletions will be effective immediately upon their posting to the Services. We encourage you to review this Cookie Notice regularly for any changes. Your continued use of the Services and/or your continued provision of personal information to us after the posting of such notice will be deemed an acceptance of any changes and subject to the terms of the then-current Cookie Notice.
back
Logging out…
Cache hit
Cache miss
Instances
Collections
Active
Save
Load
HiDPI
AA
Smooth
Subs
Elements
Triggers
Limit
Size
Used
N* v2.172.0-gl
Paused
Northstar scenes:
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy/unity-insider-privacy-policy:
Access Denied
You don't have permission to access "http://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy/unity-insider-privacy-policy" on this server.
Reference #18.1db01302.1741428349.6e393bd5
https://errors.edgesuite.net/18.1db01302.1741428349.6e393bd5
Sub-policy 1
http://www.google.com/policies/privacy:

Sub-policy 2
https://www.pangleglobal.com/privacy/enduser-en:
Home
/
Privacy and Terms
Pangle Partner Data Privacy Policy
Pangle Partner Data Privacy Policy
Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy
Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy
パートナーデータプライバシーポリシー
パートナーデータプライバシーポリシー
エンドユーザーデータプライバシーポリシー
エンドユーザーデータプライバシーポリシー
Pangle 파트너 개인정보처리방침
Pangle 파트너 개인정보처리방침
최종 사용자 개인정보처리방침
최종 사용자 개인정보처리방침
合作夥伴資料隱私權政策
合作夥伴資料隱私權政策
終端使用者資料隱私權政策
終端使用者資料隱私權政策
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Parceiro Pangle
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Parceiro Pangle
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Usuário Final Pangle
Política de Privacidade de Dados do Usuário Final Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Socio Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Socio Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Usuario Final de Pangle
Política de Privacidad de Datos del Usuario Final de Pangle
Politique de protection des données des partenaires de Pangle
Politique de protection des données des partenaires de Pangle
Politique de protection des données de l’utilisateur final de Pangle
Politique de protection des données de l’utilisateur final de Pangle
Pangle Publisher Agreement
Pangle Publisher Agreement
EEA/SWISS/UK SPECIFIC DATA TERMS (“DATA TERMS”)
EEA/SWISS/UK SPECIFIC DATA TERMS (“DATA TERMS”)
Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy
The Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy applies to personal data that we process through Pangle (as defined below), where you interact with Pangle through mobile applications and/or websites that have integrated with Pangle s advertising platform either directly or via an advertising exchange, each a “Partner”. The Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy will apply to the processing of your personal data in your capacity as an end user.
Last updated: 8 March 2023
I. Who we are and who this applies to
I.1 We are Bytedance Pte. Ltd., a company incorporated in Singapore whose registered office is at 1 Raffles Quay, #26-10 ,Singapore 048583 (" we", "our" or " us"). This Pangle End User Data Privacy Policy ("Privacy Policy") explains who we are, how we collect, process, store, use, transfer, share, and disclose ("process") personal data about you, and how you can exercise your data privacy rights.
I.2 It is the Partner’s responsibility to inform you of Pangle’s use of your data (i.e. by directing you to this policy) and to acquire all consent necessary for Pangle’s use of your data. We will process your personal data on the basis that your personal data is required for us to provide our services to the Partner under the relevant contract between us and the Partner.
I.3 If you have any questions or concerns about our processing of your personal data, please contact us using the contact details provided at the bottom of this Privacy Policy.
II. What is Pangle?
II.1 Pangle is a mobile advertising platform, including support systems and services operated by Bytedance and accessible via www.pangleglobal.com ("Pangle"). Pangle enables advertisers to serve advertisements on third party mobile applications and/or websites owned or operated by a Partner or to which a Partner has the right to serve advertising (each a“Partner Site”). We do this by processing certain information collected from those Partner Sites, as described in this Privacy Policy.
III. What personal data we process
III.1 The types of personal data that we process depend on the circumstances of collection and on the nature of the services requested or transaction undertaken for our Partners.
III.2 When you interact with a Partner Site, we process certain information about you and your device. This information may be collected automatically from your device using our software code (referred to as a "software development kit", or "SDK"), or shared with us by other advertising exchanges (e.g. Google DoubleClick). We also use cookies (text files inserted in your browser when you visit our partners or customers' mobile applications and websites) and other tracking technologies available on your device.
III.3 The information that we process about you may include some or all of the following categories:
a. Information obtained automatically from your device
i. Identifiers: We may process device-specific identifiers such as your IP address, mobile advertising identifier (such as the "Google Advertising ID" on Android phones or the "ID for Advertisers" on iOS devices), or a Pangle-specific identifier which our SDK has assigned to your device. A mobile advertising identifier is an identifier that is provided by your device operating system and allows companies, like Pangle, to recognize your device across apps for advertising purposes. In addition to the mobile advertising identifier, and other similar technologies, Pangle may also obtain your device's model, operating system (e.g. iOS or Android), your device's language settings, general geographic region, time zone, network type (such as 5G or WiFi), your ROM version, screen resolution (to know which ads which will appear best on your device), mobile country code and mobile network code, and the time your device was last updated and started.
ii. Geolocation data: We may infer your approximate geo-location from your device s IP address. We may also process your precise latitude and longitude using your phone s GPS data, where we have your consent or are otherwise permitted to do so in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
iii. Internet activity: We may process information about your app and website usage, including the name and version of the app or website that has integrated Pangle. We may also process information about your interactions with any advertisements we deliver (e.g. information about the advertisements served, viewed, or clicked on, such as the type of ad, where and when the ad was served, whether you clicked on it, and whether you visited the advertiser s website or downloaded the advertiser s app, as well as any preferences you may have expressed in respect of that advertisement).
b. Information obtained from other sources
i. From time to time, we may receive information about you from other sources. For example, we may receive information about you from third parties, such as advertising exchanges that share data with us for the purposes of serving advertising, if third parties are legally permitted to disclose this information to us.
ii. The information we receive from these sources may include identifiers (such as your IP address or mobile advertising identifier), information about your Internet activity (such as information about your interaction with third party websites, applications and advertisements) and inferences relating to your preferences and characteristics (e.g. your approximate age and gender).
IV.How we use personal data
IV.1 We use personal data to serve you with personalised advertisements and understand the audiences who see the advertisements we serve. Specifically, we process personal data for the following purposes:
a. To serve you advertisements: To enable third party advertisers to bid on and fill advertising space on Partner Apps with their advertising. We use your mobile advertising identifier, together with the other device identifiers described above, to serve you with personalised advertising and for related purposes such as frequency capping (limiting the number of times you see the same ad), attribution (making sure we get paid by advertisers for the advertisements we deliver), and fraud detection (detecting malicious software, or "bots", that generate false interactions with advertisements to drive fraudulent advertising revenues). We also use your device data to ensure we display advertisements that display properly on your device.
b. To personalise the advertisements we show you: To infer your interests from the types of apps you use and the adverts you interact with, as well as to infer certain demographic information about you (such as your age and gender) so we can show you advertisements that are more relevant to you;
c. To serve you advertisements on the basis of your location: To serve you advertisements that are relevant for your region and displayed in the relevant local language, as well as to better understand the audiences who see our advertisements, based on your current or prior location, including through location-based targeting segments created by us or by our third party advertisers.
d. For auditing and reporting: To verify accurate delivery of, and count the number of end users who see and interact with, advertisements we serve on behalf of our advertisers and what ad campaigns led to further consumer activity (such as a purchase, app install or visit) (sometimes called "attribution"). We use this information to report to our advertisers about the advertisements users have seen and interacted with, so that we and our publishers are paid appropriately for the advertisements we display.
e. To provide campaign analytics to advertisers: To provide advertisers information about how well their campaigns perform, whether relative to their prior campaigns, or bench-marked against third party campaigns or other data.
f. For cross-device targeting: To "link" or "resolve" the same user across their various devices (such as across mobile devices, browsers and tablets). For instance, we (or a third party partner we work with) may help an advertiser "find" a consumer they have engaged with previously on a mobile device when that consumer is browsing on their tablet, in order to target ads to the user across those devices.
g. To detect security incidents, protect against malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal activity, and prosecute those responsible for such activities: For example, to identify invalid clicks (or advertising queries) and protect us and our advertisers from fraudulent behaviour.
h. To verify or maintain the quality of Pangle and improve, upgrade or enhance Pangle: For example, (i) for audit, research, and analysis of the information in order to maintain, improve, upgrade or enhance our advertising services, and to ensure that our technologies function properly; and (ii) other internal operations, such as debugging, support, and security.
i. For compliance with legal obligations: To comply with legal obligations that apply to us, for example to respond to law enforcement requests.
j. For archiving purposes in the public interest, scientific or historical research purposes.
k. For any other purpose to which you consent: To use your personal data for any other purpose to which you have provided consent.
IV.2 In general, we will process personal data only for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy or for purposes that are explained to you at the time your personal data is collected. However, we may also use your personal data for other purposes that are not incompatible with the purposes we have disclosed to you if and where this is permitted by applicable data protection laws.
V. Who we share your personal data with
V.1 We may share your personal data for the purposes described above in this Privacy Policy with the following categories of recipients:
a Our advertising partners and platforms: We may share personal data with our
advertising partners
(such as DSPs) and partner platforms (such as
TikTok for Business
) in connection with their bidding on the ad opportunity and optimizing their ad bidding systems and ad biddingÅ strategies, so as to target and display advertisements on Publisher Partner Apps on behalf of advertisers.
b. Our advertisers: We also share limited personal data in aggregated form with our advertising partners, through reports about the kinds of people seeing their advertisements and how their advertisements are performing (for example, that an ad was seen by 100 men between the ages of 25 and 34 who live in Singapore and like football). Aggregated data cannot by itself can be used to contact you or identify your name. We also report to our advertising partners which Pangle advertisements resulted in you making a purchase or taking an action with an advertiser.
c. Partners: We share aggregated data with Partners through reports about the types of advertisements served to their apps, in order that they can measure the effectiveness and value of our services. As these reports are aggregated they do not reveal any information that directly identifies you.
d. Our affiliates, corporate group and third party service providers: We share personal data with our affiliates and other companies, including other Bytedance entities, who help us operate our business, perform functions on our behalf or provide services to us, including data processing services to us (for example, to support, provide functionality on, or help to enhance the accuracy, safety and security of our services, or to provide analytics or attribution services to us, as well as service providers who provide technical, customer, hosting, data hygiene and enhancement or operational support), as well as other professional advisors. We may also share personal data with members of our corporate group to improve their ads systems and processes, to help them deliver more relevant ads to you and to reach you on non-Bytedance properties.
e. Our analytics and attribution partners: We share personal data with our analytics and attribution partners who help us monitor the success of our advertising campaigns (such as how many end users saw and clicked on an advertisement) and provide reporting to our advertisers.
f. Any competent law enforcement body, regulatory, government agency, court or other third party: We may share personal data with these parties where we believe disclosure is necessary (i) as a matter of applicable law or regulation; (ii) to exercise, establish or defend our legal rights; (iii) to detect and protect against fraud or other security or technical vulnerabilities; (iv) to respond to an emergency; or (v) to otherwise protect your vital interests or those of any other person where permitted by applicable law.
g. Any other person: We will only share personal data with any other person with your consent to the disclosure or as otherwise permitted under applicable data protection law.
VI. How we keep your personal data secure
VI.1 We use reasonable technical and organisational measures to protect the personal data that we process about you. The measures we use are designed to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk of processing your personal data.
VII. International data transfers
VII.1 Your personal data may be transferred to, and processed in, countries other than the country in which you are located or in which your personal data was collected. However, we will not transfer or permit any of your personal data to be transferred outside of such country unless we have taken measures necessary to ensure the transfer is in compliance with applicable laws, and in any case to a recipient that has comparable privacy protections in place.
VII.2 Specifically, our servers are located in the United States of America and Singapore, and our group companies and third party service providers and partners operate around the world. This means that we may process your personal data in any of these countries in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
VIII. Data retention
VIII.1 We retain your personal data for as long as it is necessary to provide you with services so that we can fulfil our contractual obligations and exercise our rights in relation to the information involved. Where we do not need your information in order to provide services to you, we retain it only for so long as we have a legitimate business purpose in keeping such data or as necessary to comply with the law.
VIII.2 When we have no ongoing legitimate business or legal need to process your personal data, we will either delete or anonymise it or, if this is not possible (for example, because your personal data has been stored in backup archives or the law requires otherwise), then we will securely store your personal data and isolate it from any further processing until deletion is possible.
IX. Targeted ads and your right to opt-out
Our partners use the Pangle SDK for the purpose of serving targeted ads to you. To do this, Pangle receives and processes device information such as cookies, mobile advertising identifiers, IP addresses, user agent information and browsing or app data where the SDK is installed. Pangle uses this device information to identify your device and deliver relevant ads to you.
IX.1 Opt-out
You can opt out of ads that are targeted based on data Pangle previously received about you by clicking
Ad label
. Pangle's ability to opt you out of targeted ads depends on our ability to recognize your device. As device and connection information can change frequently, we encourage you to revisit this page periodically to ensure your opt-outs are up to date.
IX.2 Non-targeted ads
If you opt out of targeted ads, Pangle will stop showing ads based on data it previously collected and can link to your device. However, Pangle may still show you ads based on data it receives about the context of the app or website you are visiting (e.g. sports advertisements in a sports app) or your device (ads for iPhone users or Android users).
X. Your data protection rights
X.1 Pangle supports the exercise of your data protection rights which may be available in your country in accordance with applicable data protection laws. Specifically:
a. You can request to access, correct, update or delete your personal data by contacting us using the contact details provided under the "How to contact us" section below, and we will fulfil your request if these rights are available under applicable data protection laws in your country.
b. You can opt out of targeted advertising by following the instructions described above under the "Your right to control personalised advertisements" section above.
X.2 We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws. We do not discriminate against any individual based on the exercise of their data protection rights. However, we may request for you to further provide us with your personal information for the purposes of verifying your identity.
XI. Children
XI.1 Where applicable laws prohibit us from processing personal data about children who are under specified age thresholds or require us to obtain parental consent before we may process personal data about such children, then we will not knowingly process personal data about children unless we are in compliance with those laws.
XI.2 If you believe we may be processing personal data relating to children contrary to applicable law, please contact us using the contact details provided under the "How to contact us" section below and we will investigate and, where necessary, take appropriate steps to cease any such processing and delete any such personal data.
XII. Updates to this Privacy Policy
XII.1 This Privacy Policy is effective as of the date set out at the top of this Privacy Policy.
XII.2 We may update this Privacy Policy from time to time, including in response to changing legal, technical or business developments, in accordance with applicable law.
XII.3 You can see when this Privacy Policy was last updated by checking the "last updated" date displayed at the top of this Privacy Policy.
XIII. How to contact us
XIII.1 If you have any questions or concerns about our use of your personal data, please contact us using the details below.
- For individuals located in the European Economic Area, United Kingdom or Switzerland: europe_privacy@pangleglobal.com
- For individuals located in any other part of the world: privacy@pangleglobal.com.
- For individuals located in the Americas: americas_privacy@pangleglobal.com
XIV. Language
XIV.1 This Privacy Policy is made in English and translations into other languages may be provided. In the event of any conflict between the English version and any translations, the English version will prevail to the extent permitted by the prevailing laws.
Jurisdiction-specific terms
For individuals located in Israel:
The following paragraph shall be added to the end of section III. What personal data we process:
III.4 You are under no legal obligation to provide us any personal data.
The following paragraph shall be added to the end of section VII. International Data Transfers:
VII.3 You hereby consent to the transfer of your personal data as set out in this Section VII.
The following paragraph shall be added to the end of section X. Your data protection rights:
X.3 You have the right to appeal the refusal of Pangle to comply with your request to exercise your rights in a court of competent jurisdiction.
For individuals located in Brazil
If you are using the Platform in Brazil, the following additional terms apply. If any conflict arises between the main Privacy Policy and the additional terms, the following terms shall prevail:
The following paragraph shall replace section I, 1.2. of this Privacy Policy:
I.2 It is the Partner’s responsibility to inform you of Pangle’s use of your data (i.e. by directing you to this policy) and to acquire all necessary authorizations for Pangle’s use of your data. We will process your personal data on the basis that your personal data is required for us to provide our services to the Partner under the relevant contract between us and the Partner.
The following paragraph shall replace section III.3, a, ii. of this Privacy Policy:
ii. Geolocation data: We may infer your approximate geo-location from your device s IP address. We may also process your precise latitude and longitude using your phone s GPS data, where we have proper authorization or are otherwise permitted to do so in accordance with applicable data protection laws.
The following paragraph shall replace section IV, k. of this Privacy Policy:
k. For any other purpose in compliance with the applicable data protection law: To use your personal data for any other purpose in compliance with the applicable data protection law.
The following paragraph shall replace section V, g. of this Privacy Policy:
g. Any other person: We will only share personal data with any other person in compliance with the applicable data protection law.
The following paragraph shall replace section X. of this Privacy Policy:
Exercise of data protection rights. Brazilian law provides certain rights to individuals with regard to their personal data. Thus, we seek to ensure transparency and access controls in order to allow users to benefit from the mentioned rights.
We will respond and/or fulfill your requests for the exercise of your rights below, according to the applicable law and when applicable, to the Brazilian General Data Protection Law - LGPD:
I. confirmation of whether your data are being processed;
II. access to your data;
III. correction of incomplete, inaccurate or outdated data;
IV. anonymization, blocking or erasure of data;
V. portability of personal data to a third party;
VI. object to the processing of personal data. Please note that you can opt out of targeted advertising by following the instructions described above under the "Your right to control personalised advertisements" section above;
VII. information of public and private entities with which we shared data;
VIII. information about the possibility to refuse providing personal data and the respective consequences, when applicable;
IX. withdrawal of your consent.
Verifying your identity: For your safety and to allow us to make sure that we do not disclose any of your personal data to unauthorized third parties, in order to verify your identity and guarantee the adequate exercise of your rights, we may request specific information and/or documents from you before we can properly respond to a request received concerning your data. All data and documents received from you in the process of responding to your requests will be used for the strict purposes of analyzing your request, authenticating your identity, and finally responding to your request.
Limitations to your rights: In certain situations, we may have legitimate reasons not to comply with some of your requests. For instance, we may choose not to disclose certain information to you when a disclosure could adversely impact our business whenever there is a risk of violation to our trade secrets or intellectual property rights. In addition, we may refrain from complying with a request for erasure when the maintenance of your data is required for complying with legal or regulatory obligations or when such maintenance is required to protect our rights and interests in case a dispute arises. Whenever this is the case and we are unable to comply with a request you make, we will let you know the reasons why we cannot fulfill your request.
DPO: If you wish to reach the Pangle’s Data Protection Officer, contact us at: dpobrasil@pangleglobal.com
Access Logs. We keep your application access logs, under confidentiality, in a controlled and safe environment, for, at least, 6 (six)  months, in order to comply with legal obligations.
The following paragraph shall be added to section XI. of this Privacy Policy:
Parental and Guardian Consent. If required by Brazilian data protection laws, (i) if you are over the age of 16 but under the age of 18, you can only use and register for an account with the assistance of your parent or legal guardian and you declare and represent that you had such assistance to use the Services and to agree to the Policy; (ii) if you are over the age of 13 but under the age of 16, you can only use and register for an account with the representation of your parent or legal guardian, and you must obtain the consent from your parent or legal guardian to the use of the Services and acceptance of this Privacy Policy; and (iii) if you are under the age of 13 you are not allowed to have an account.
For individuals located in the European Economic Area, United Kingdom or Switzerland:
The following paragraph shall replace section X. of this Privacy Policy:
Your data protection rights
X.1 Pangle supports the exercise of your data protection rights which may be available in your country in accordance with applicable data protection laws. Specifically:
a. Opt-out of targeted advertising: You can opt out of targeted advertising by following the instructions described above under the "Your right to control personalised advertisements" section above.
b. Access Your Data: You can ask us, free of charge, to confirm we process your personal data and for a copy of your personal data.
c. Delete Your Data: You can ask us to delete all or some of your personal data.
d. Change or Correct Data: You can ask us to change or fix your data.
e. Portability: You can ask for a copy of personal data you provided in a machine-readable for
f. Object or Restrict Use of Data and Withdraw Consent: You can ask us to stop using some or all of your data, e.g. if we have no legal right to keep using it. You can ask us to stop processing your personal data for direct marketing purposes; withdraw your consent or ask us to stop making any automatic individual decisions, including profiling. If you object to such processing, we ask you to share the reason for your objection in order for us to examine the processing of your personal data and to balance our legitimate interest in processing and your objection to this processing.
g. Complain: The right to lodge complaints before the competent data protection regulator.
X.2 For further information, contact us using the contact details provided under the "How to contact us" section below. We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws. If you do not provide your personal data, we will not be able to provide some or all of our services to you. If you have made a specific request to us, and do not provide personal data that we can use to identify you (such as a device identifier) we will be unable to fulfil your request. The following paragraph shall be added as section XIV of this Privacy Policy:
XIV. Legal basis
XIV.1 In the European Economic Area and the United Kingdom we must have a legal basis to process your personal data. For users located in these regions, we will only serve targeted adverts to you with your consent. The legal basis for other processing of your personal data will depend on the personal data concerned and the specific context in which we process it. If we process your personal data in our legitimate interests, such as for security and product improvement purposes, this interest will normally be to provide an effective, secure and dynamic platform.
XIV.2 In some cases, we process your data to comply with our legal obligations, with your consent or where it is in the vital interests of you or another person.
XIV.3 If you have questions about or need further information concerning the legal basis on which we collect and use your personal data, please contact us using the contact details provided under the “How to contact us” heading below.
By Clicking "Accept All Cookies", you agree to the storing of
Cookies
on your device to enhance your user experience.
Accept all
Reject all